Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the J.D. McCarty
Center for Children with Developmental Disabilities from any monies
not otherwise appropriated from the Statewide Recovery Fund of the
State Treasury created in Section 255 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, the sum of Eight Hundred Thousand Dollars ($800,000.00) or
so much thereof as may be necessary to provide medical care for
children with developmental disabilities who are disproportionately
impacted by the pandemic. Such funds shall be utilized in a manner
consistent with the recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee
on Pandemic Relief Funding on May 12, 2025.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1179 Page 2